Alaska statutes. Title 45. Trade and Commerce.
Article 8. Rental Car Fees.

Cross references. —

For legislative findings and statement of intent applicable to the enactment of this article, see § 1, ch. 50, SLA 2010, in the 2010 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effective dates. —

Section 2, ch. 50, SLA 2010, which enacted this article, makes this article effective September 5, 2010.

Sec. 45.45.450.
Identification of cost recovery fees.

If a rental car business charges a cost recovery fee, the rental car business shall separately identify and charge for each cost recovery fee in writing in the rental car agreement. In this section, “cost recovery fee” means a vehicle licensing cost recovery fee, an airport-related cost, a government tax, or a government surcharge.

History.

(§ 2 ch 50 SLA 2010)

Sec. 45.45.455.
Vehicle licensing cost recovery fee.

A rental car business may not charge a renter a vehicle licensing cost recovery fee unless the vehicle licensing cost recovery fee represents a good faith estimate by the rental car business of the average daily cost to the rental car business of recovering its actual total annual licensing costs in the state during a calendar year.

If the total amount of the vehicle licensing cost recovery fees collected by a rental car business during a calendar year exceeds the actual amount of the rental car business’s licensing costs during that calendar year, the rental car business shall

retain the excess amount; and

adjust the good faith estimate required by (a) of this section for the next calendar year so that the good faith estimate reflects the excess amount.

In addition to the adjustment required by (b) of this section, a rental car business may adjust its vehicle licensing cost recovery fee during the calendar year when the excess vehicle licensing cost recovery fees are collected if the vehicle licensing cost recovery fee otherwise complies with this section.

History.

(§ 2 ch 50 SLA 2010)

Revisor’s notes. —

This section was enacted as AS 45.45.460; renumbered in 2010.

Sec. 45.45.459.
Definitions.

In AS

45.45.450

—

45.45.459

,

“car” means a motor vehicle;

“licensing cost” means the cost of titling, registering, obtaining license plates for, or inspection of the rental cars of a rental car business in the state;

“motor vehicle” has the meaning given in AS

28.90.990

;

“rental car business” means a person who engages in the business of renting cars in the state;

“vehicle licensing cost recovery fee” means a fee to recover licensing costs.

History.

(§ 2 ch 50 SLA 2010)

Revisor’s notes. —

This section was enacted as AS 45.45.470; renumbered in 2010, at which time a conforming amendment was made in the section text.